tables/en-us-g3.ctb
# the letter d
always daredevil 145-345-15-145-15-1236-24-123
always day 5-145
always dday 145-5-145
begword deact 245-1-14-2345
begword deall 245-1-456
word decay 245-14-4
word decayed 245-14-4-1246
word decaying 245-14-4-346
word decays 245-14-4-234
word decide 245-14-24-245
word decided 245-14-24-145-1246
word deciding 245-14-24-145-346
word decides 245-14-24-145-1356
word decision 245-14-24-46-1345
word decisions 245-14-24-46-1345-234
word decider 245-14-24-145-12456
word deciders 245-14-24-145-12456-234
word deduce 245-145-136-36
word deduces 245-145-136-14-1356
word deducing 245-145-136-14-346
word deducingly 245-145-136-14-346-45
word deduction 245-145-136-14-56-1345
word deductions 245-145-136-14-56-1345-234
word deductive 245-145-136-14-2345-24-1236
word deductively 245-145-136-14-2345-24-1236-45
word deduct 245-145-136-14-2345
word deducted 245-145-136-14-2345-1246
word deducting 245-145-136-14-2345-346
word deducts 245-145-136-14-2345-234
word deduction 245-145-136-14-56-1345
word deductions 245-145-136-14-56-1345-234
begword deact 245-1-14-2345
begword deocc 245-135-25
always ded 145-1246
always den 145-26
always deen 145-15-26
begword deener 245-26-12456
always dein 145-15-35
always deing 145-15-346
word desk 145-15-234-13
begword desk 145-15-234-13
begword deo 145-5
begword deu 145-5
begword dew 145-15-2456
begword dey 145-5
begword deny 145-26-13456
begword debut 145-15-12-136-2345
begword de 245
begword decom 245-36
begword decon 245-25
begword dere 245-246
endword de 245
always dear 45-256
begword decarb 145-15-14-345-12
always deceive 145-14-1236
contraction dcv
contraction dcvd
contraction dcvr
contraction dcvs
always deceiving 145-14-1236-1245
contraction dcvg
always declare 145-14-123
contraction dcl
contraction dcld
contraction dclr
contraction dcls
word declaring 145-14-123-1245
contraction dclg
begword deref = dereferencing
begword dereg = deregulation
midword dd 256
begword dedic 145-1246-24-14 dedicated
always dedu = nondeductible
begword deno = denote
always denom =
begword denou 145-15-1345-1256 denounce
begword denu = denunciation
begword dera = derail
begword deri 145-15-1235-24
begword dero = derogatory
word did 456-145
word differ 4-256
begword differ 4-256
always difficult 145-235-14
begword dino 145-35-135 dinoflagellate
begword dis 256
begword disbe 256-23
begword discom 256-36
begword discon 256-25
begword disre 256-246
begword disun 256-346
word disc =
word discs =
always dish 145-24-146
begword disha 256-125-1 dishabile
begword dishear 256-125-15-345 disheartened
begword disho 256-125-135 dishonor
begword dishone 256-125-5-135 dishonest
sufword disk =
sufword dispirit 145-24-456-234 dispirited
begword disul = disulfide
word do 145
word does 45-145
word doing 4-145
word done 456-145
word down 456-256
begword down 456-256
syllable down 145-246-1345 facedown
word during 5-256
always edress = vinedresser
syllable drum = kettledrum
always edom =
always reduc =
always seduc =
# syllable dun =

# the letter e
midword ea 2
midword eabil = interchangeability
always eable 15-1-3456
endword eably = noticeably
word each 45-15
midendword eage = mileage
midendword eager 2-1245-12456 meager
always eally 15-6-13456
midendword eance 15-46-15 vengeance
midendword eand 15-12346 meander
always eation 15-6-1345
always ear 15-345
always ed 1246
begword edic = edict Benedict
sufword edition 15-145-24-56-1345 editions
syllable draw =
midword ee 5
always eed 15-1246
always een 15-26
always eer 15-12456
word either 15-24
contraction ei
word en =
midword ei 5
always ein 15-35
always eing 15-346
always en 26
begword encom 26-36
begword ende 26-245
begword enun 26-346
always ename 15-5-1345
sufword enamel 26-1-134-15-123 enameled
midendword ence 56-15
endword ences 56-1356
word enclose 456-26
begword enclose 456-26
word enclosing 456-26-1245
begword enclosing 456-26-1245
word endeavor 45-26
begword endeavor 45-26
syllable neck = bottleneck
midendword eness 15-56-234 closeness
begword enor = enormous
begword enou 15-1345-1256
lowword enough 26
word enough 26-1256-126
word enter 4-26
begword enter 4-26
endword enter 4-26
word entire 5-26
begword entire 5-26
begword enu 15-1345-136
midword eo 5
always er 12456
begword era =
word eras 12456-1-234
begword erec = erect 
begword ero 15-1235-135
syllable room = storeroom
begword eru = erupt
endword es 1356
endword ies 24-1356
word especial 15-126
begword especial 15-126
word etc. 4-15
endword ete 356
midword eu 5
word even 456-15
begword even 456-15
always evert 15-1236-12456-2345
always nevertheless 1345-5-15-2346-46-234
always ever 5-15
midendword evere 15-1236-12456-15 Everest
always evered 15-1236-12456-1246
word every 15
word everybody 15-12-145-13456
word everyone 15-5-135
word everything 15-1456-346
word everywhere 15-5-156
begword exa 1346-1
begword exar 1346-345
begword exe 1346-15
begword exed 1346-1246
begword exen 1346-26
begword exer 1346-12456
begword exi 1346-24
begword exin 1346-35
begword exing 1346-346
begword exo 1346-135
begword ex 1346
always example 456-1346
begword exampli 456-1346
always exampling 456-1346-1245
always exceeding 1346-145-346
word except 4-1346
begword except 4-1346
word extra 5-1346
begword extra 5-1346
word extreme 45-1346
begword extreme 45-1346
midword ey 5




# the letter f
midword ff 235
syllable ffold 235-135-123-145 scaffold
always faith 124-1456
always father 5-124
word fear 45-124
begword fear 45-124
word few 124-2456
begword few 124-2456
always fein 124-15-35 Feingold
word first 4-124
begword first 4-124
always fever 124-15-1236-12456
word follow 456-124
begword follow 456-124
always ffor 124-123456
largesign for 123456
begword fora 123456-1 foramen
always fore 123456-15
word foreign 5-123456
begword foreign 5-123456
begword forens 123456-26-234 forensic
always forever 123456-5-15 forevermore
word forget 4-123456
begword forget 4-123456
word fortunate    456-123456
begword fortunate 456-123456
endword fortunate 456-123456
word fortune    45-123456
begword fortune 45-123456
endword fortune 45-123456
always forward 123456-2456
always frequent 124-1235-12345
syllable fold =
syllable foot =
word from 124
word friend 124-1235
word boyfriend 12-135-13456-124-1235
word girlfriend 1245-24-1235-123-124-1235
word friends 124-1235-234
word boyfriends 12-135-13456-124-1235-234
word girlfriends 1245-24-1235-123-124-1235-234
word friendless 124-1235-46-234
sufword friendship 124-1235-146-24-1234
sufword friendl 124-1235-123
contraction fr
always fruity =
midendword ful 124-123
always funder 124-136-1345-145-12456

# the letter g
word gave 456-2356
endword gave 456-2356
endword ge 2356
word general 1245-26
begword general 1245-26
begword geo = geoengineering
always get 1245-2345
always getting 1245-356-346
sufword geoff 1245-15-12356-124 Geoffrey
midword gg 2356
always gh 126
endword gham = Langham
midendword ghill = dunghill
always ghz = (gigahertz)
always give 5-2356
word given 456-2356
endword given 456-2356
word giving 4-2356
endword giving 4-2356
word glory 1245-123
sufword gnome = gnomedb
word go 1245
always god 5-1245
word goes 45-1245
endword goes 45-1245
word going 4-1245
endword going 4-1245
word gone 456-1245
endword gone 456-1245
sufword good 1245-145
contraction gd
always good-by 1245-145-36-12-13456
always govern 1245-135-1236
word grace 1245-1235
endword grace 1245-1235
syllable grad = leningrad
word great 45-2356
begword great 45-2356
endword great 1245-1235-2345
contraction grt

# the letter h
word has 45-125
word hasn't 45-125-1345-3-2345
always had 456-125
always hadd 125-1-256 haddock
sufword hade = hadean 
syllable hand 125-12346
word have 125
word having 4-125
syllable hawk =
syllable hawthorn 125-1-2456-1456-135-1235-1345
word he 4-236
syllable head 125-2-145
word hear 45-236
begword hear 45-236
always hedgerow 125-1246-1245-15-1235-246
always help 125-123-1234
word her 456-236
word hers 456-236-234
syllable herd 125-12456-145 goatherd
always here 5-125
always hereafter 5-125-1-124
always hered 125-12456-1246
always heren 125-12456-26
midendword herence 125-12456-56-15 adherence
always herer 125-12456-12456
always heres 125-12456-15-234
always heret 125-12456-15-2345
word heretofore 5-125-2345-135-123456-15
word herself 125-12456-124
word him 125-134
word His 6-236
word hm 125-3-134
sufword hmm =
word himself 125-134-124
contraction hmf
lowword his 236
word holy 125-123
endword holy 125-123
always home 125-134-15
word homed 125-134-145
endword homed 125-134-145
always homing 125-134-1245
word homes 125-134-1356
endword homes 125-134-1356
syllable holm =
syllable hood =
syllable horn =
always hope 125-1234-15
word hoped 125-1234-145
endword hoped 125-1234-145
word hopes 125-1234-1356
endword hopes 125-1234-1356
always hoping 125-1234-1245
syllable horse = horseradish
word house 5-236
begword house 5-236
word housing 5-236-1245
begword housing 5-236-1245
word how 5-246
word however 45-246
syllable hydro =
always hwh =

# the letter i
word I 24
midword ia 6
always iar 24-345
endword ian 6
word idea 45-24
begword idea 45-24
midword ie 6
always ied 24-1246
always ien 24-26
always ier 24-12456
midendword iever 24-15-1236-12456
word if 4-24
midendword igh 126
word immediate 24-134-134
contraction imm
word immediately 24-134-134-123-13456
contraction immly
begword immuno = immunofluorescence
always import 5-24
always improve 456-24
lowword in 35
nofor midword inin 35-35
word in =
always in 35
endword in' 35-3
begword inbe 35-23
begword incom 35-36
begword incon 35-25
begword inde 35-245
begword indis 35-256
begword inun 35-346
word indeed 35-145
midendword iness 24-56-234
midendword ing 346
midword inga 35-1245-1 nightingale
always ingar 35-1245-345 Weingarten
midendword ingent 346-26-2345 stringent
midword ingenc 346-26-14 contingency
midword ingen 35-1245-26 palingenesis (new birth)
midword ingi 35-1245-24 meningitis
midendword inging 346-346 bringing
word inside 4-35
begword inside 4-35
word insiding 4-35-1245
begword insiding 4-35-1245
word instant 5-35
begword instant 5-35
word instead 45-35
always interest 456-35
joinword into 35-235
midword io 6
endword ion 6
endword ire 24
lowword is 25
endword ise 156
always isinglass 24-234-35-1245-123-1-234-234
always isomer 24-234-135-134-12456
word it 1346
word it's 1346-3-234
word it'd 1346-3-145
word it'll 1346-3-456
word its 1346-234
contraction xs
word itself 1346-124
contraction xf
endword ite 356
endword ity 56
midword iu 6
endword ize 156

# the letter j
word jesus 5-245
word join 4-245
begword join 4-245
endword join 4-245
word judge 45-245
begword judge 45-245
word judging 45-245-1245
begword judging 45-245-1245
always judgment 456-245
word just 245
word justice 245-36
endword justice 245-36
word justly 245-45
endword justly 245-45

# the letter k
always keep 45-13
word kind 4-13
begword kind 4-13
word knew 456-13
always knot = knothole
always know 5-13
word knowledge 13
word known 456-13

# the letter l
always \s-\shis 36-36-125-24-234
always \s-\swas 36-36-2456-1-234
sufword land 123-12346 landowner
endword le 12345
word least 45-123
word leave 45-1236
begword leave 45-1236
word leaving 45-1236-1245
begword leaving 45-1236-1245
word left 456-1236
midendword less 46-234
word let 123-2345
begword let 123-2345
word letting 123-356-346
begword letting 123-356-346
sufword letter 123-1235
contraction lr
sufword newsletter 1345-15-2456-234-123-1235
word unlettered 136-1345-123-1235-1246
word life 4-123
begword life 4-123
word like 123
word likely 123-45
endword likely 123-45
word likewise 123-2456-156
always lineage 123-35-2-1245-15
sufword little 123-123
contraction ll
word live 4-1236
begword live 4-1236
endword live 4-1236
word living 4-1236-1245
begword living 4-1236-1245
midendword ll 456
sufword lone 123-5-135 lonely
always loner 123-135-1345-12456
word long 456-123
begword long 456-123
endword long 456-123
always look 123-13
always lord 5-123
word love 5-1236
begword love 5-1236
word loving 5-1236-1245
begword loving 5-1236-1245
endword ly 45
